Utah statutes.
53A-10-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Career educator" means a licensed employee entitled to rely upon continued employment under the policies of a local school board.

(2)  "Educator" means an individual employed by a school district who is required to hold a professional license issued by the State Board of Education, except:

(a)  a superintendent; or

(b)  an individual who:

(i)  works fewer than three hours per day; or

(ii)  is hired for less than half of a school year.

(3)  "Probationary educator" means an educator employed by a school district who, under local school board policy, has been advised by the district that the educator's performance is inadequate.

(4)  "Provisional educator" means an educator employed by a school district who has not achieved status as a career educator within the school district.

